Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1107
Petition; hearing; publication of notice.

Upon receipt of a petition under section 85-1105, the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall set a time and a place for a public hearing thereon and shall cause notice thereof to be published in one or more newspapers of general circulation not less than thirty and not more than sixty days prior to the date set for the hearing. Such hearing shall be held as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1967, c. 513, § 3, p. 1719;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 79-2403;

Laws 1979, LB 141, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 129;

Laws 1993, LB 93, § 5.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.